Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 5 Family Members of Public Employees

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the provisions of that Act do not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

45-10-80.
Public officers prohibited from advancing, employing, or advocating the employment of family members.

A public officer, as defined in subparagraphs (A) through (E) of paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3, is prohibited from advocating for or causing the advancement, appointment, employment, promotion, or transfer of a member of his or her family, as such term is defined in Code Section 21-5-3, to an office or position to become a public employee, as defined in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 45-1-4, that pays an annual salary of $10,000.00 or more or its equivalent.

Any person advanced, appointed, employed, promoted, or transferred in violation of this Code section shall not be entitled to any payment, salary, or benefits received for any position so illegally obtained; and any person who receives payment, salary, or benefits for a position obtained in violation of this Code section shall be required to reimburse the state for all amounts so received.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 25/HB 48; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 45/SB 465.

Law reviews.

For article on 2005 enactment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 119 (2005).